Virginia statutes. Title 8.9A. Commercial Code — Secured Transactions.
Official Comments in Article 9A:

Copyright 1999 by the American Law Institute and the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws.
Reprinted with permission of the Permanent Editorial Board of the Uniform Commercial Code.

The Revision of Uniform Commercial Code Article 9 - Secured Transactions was drafted by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws and The American Law Institute on April 27, 2011. The Official Commentary for the 2010 revision are copyrighted 2010 by The American Law Institute and National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws.